Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,228
Attorney's fees; expenses; allowance.

The court rendering a judgment for the claimant under the State Tort Claims Act, the Risk Manager or State Claims Board making an award under section 81-8,211, or the Attorney General settling a claim under section 81-8,218 shall determine and allow reasonable attorney's fees and expenses, to be paid out of but not in addition to the amount of judgment or award recovered, to the attorneys representing the claimant.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 20, p. 2852;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 39;

Laws 2008, LB821, § 8.